dictionaries/ka_GE.aff
FLAG long
# normal stem (მეგობარო)
SFX NN Y 34
SFX NN   ი       მა              ი               # cases
SFX NN   0       მა              [აეოუ]
SFX NN   ი       ს               ი
SFX NN   0       ს               [აეოუ]
SFX NN   ი       ო               ი
SFX NN   0       ო               [აუ]
SFX NN   0       ვ               [ეო]
SFX NN   ი       სა              ი
SFX NN   0       სა              [აეოუ]
SFX NN   0       სა              ი
SFX NN   ი       ნი              ი               # How about non-ი words?
SFX NN   ი       თა              ი
SFX NN   ი       თო              ი
SFX NN   ი       ში              ი               # others
SFX NN   0       ში              [აეოუ]
SFX NN   0       ც               .
SFX NN   0       ცა              .
SFX NN   ი       მაც             ი
SFX NN   0       მაც             [აეოუ]
SFX NN   ი       საც             ი
SFX NN   0       საც             [აეოუ]
SFX NN   0       საც             ი
SFX NN   0       სიც             [ოუ]
SFX NN   ი       შიც             ი
SFX NN   0       შიც             [აეოუ]
SFX NN   ი       ვით             ი
SFX NN   0       სავით           [აეოუ]
SFX NN   ი       ზე              ი
SFX NN   0       ზე              [აეოუ]
SFX NN   ი       თან             ი
SFX NN   0       სთან            [აეოუ]
SFX NN   ა       იდან            ა
SFX NN   ე       იდან            ე
SFX NN   0       დან             [ოუ]


#########
# Verbs #
#########










#############################################
# Verb Prefixes (Preverb + Personal Prefix) #
#############################################






PFX 0I Y 1
PFX 0I 0       მი/&x     .

PFX 1I Y 1
PFX 1I 0       მივ/&x     .

PFX 2I Y 1
PFX 2I 0       მიმ/&x     .

PFX 3I Y 1
PFX 3I 0       მიგ/&x     .

PFX 4I Y 3
PFX 4I 0       მის/&x        [დტთძწცჯჭჩ]
PFX 4I 0       მიჰ/&x        [გკქგყ]
PFX 4I 0       მი/&x [^დტთძწცჯჭჩგკქგყ]

PFX 5I Y 1
PFX 5I 0       მიგვ/&x    .

PFX 6I Y 1
PFX 6I 0       მიმი/&x    .

PFX 7I Y 1
PFX 7I 0       მიგი/&x    .

PFX 8I Y 1
PFX 8I 0       მიგვი/&x   .

PFX 9I Y 1
PFX 9I 0       მიუ/&x     .
  
PFX 0o Y 1
PFX 0o 0       მო/&x     .

PFX 1o Y 1
PFX 1o 0       მოვ/&x     .

PFX 2o Y 1
PFX 2o 0       მომ/&x     .

PFX 3o Y 1
PFX 3o 0       მოგ/&x     .

PFX 4o Y 3
PFX 4o 0       მოს/&x        [დტთძწცჯჭჩ]
PFX 4o 0       მოჰ/&x        [გკქგყ]
PFX 4o 0       მო/&x [^დტთძწცჯჭჩგკქგყ]

PFX 5o Y 1
PFX 5o 0       მოგვ/&x    .

PFX 6o Y 1
PFX 6o 0       მომი/&x    .

PFX 7o Y 1
PFX 7o 0       მოგი/&x    .

PFX 8o Y 1
PFX 8o 0       მოგვი/&x   .

PFX 9o Y 1
PFX 9o 0       მოუ/&x     .
  
PFX 0A Y 1
PFX 0A 0       ა/&x     .

PFX 1A Y 1
PFX 1A 0       ავ/&x     .

PFX 2A Y 1
PFX 2A 0       ამ/&x     .

PFX 3A Y 1
PFX 3A 0       აგ/&x     .

PFX 4A Y 3
PFX 4A 0       ას/&x        [დტთძწცჯჭჩ]
PFX 4A 0       აჰ/&x        [გკქგყ]
PFX 4A 0       ა/&x [^დტთძწცჯჭჩგკქგყ]

PFX 5A Y 1
PFX 5A 0       აგვ/&x    .

PFX 6A Y 1
PFX 6A 0       ამი/&x    .

PFX 7A Y 1
PFX 7A 0       აგი/&x    .

PFX 8A Y 1
PFX 8A 0       აგვი/&x   .

PFX 9A Y 1
PFX 9A 0       აუ/&x     .
  
PFX 0C Y 1
PFX 0C 0       ჩა/&x     .

PFX 1C Y 1
PFX 1C 0       ჩავ/&x     .

PFX 2C Y 1
PFX 2C 0       ჩამ/&x     .

PFX 3C Y 1
PFX 3C 0       ჩაგ/&x     .

PFX 4C Y 3
PFX 4C 0       ჩას/&x        [დტთძწცჯჭჩ]
PFX 4C 0       ჩაჰ/&x        [გკქგყ]
PFX 4C 0       ჩა/&x [^დტთძწცჯჭჩგკქგყ]

PFX 5C Y 1
PFX 5C 0       ჩაგვ/&x    .

PFX 6C Y 1
PFX 6C 0       ჩამი/&x    .

PFX 7C Y 1
PFX 7C 0       ჩაგი/&x    .

PFX 8C Y 1
PFX 8C 0       ჩაგვი/&x   .

PFX 9C Y 1
PFX 9C 0       ჩაუ/&x     .
  
PFX 0a Y 1
PFX 0a 0       ამო/&x     .

PFX 1a Y 1
PFX 1a 0       ამოვ/&x     .

PFX 2a Y 1
PFX 2a 0       ამომ/&x     .

PFX 3a Y 1
PFX 3a 0       ამოგ/&x     .

PFX 4a Y 3
PFX 4a 0       ამოს/&x        [დტთძწცჯჭჩ]
PFX 4a 0       ამოჰ/&x        [გკქგყ]
PFX 4a 0       ამო/&x [^დტთძწცჯჭჩგკქგყ]

PFX 5a Y 1
PFX 5a 0       ამოგვ/&x    .

PFX 6a Y 1
PFX 6a 0       ამომი/&x    .

PFX 7a Y 1
PFX 7a 0       ამოგი/&x    .

PFX 8a Y 1
PFX 8a 0       ამოგვი/&x   .

PFX 9a Y 1
PFX 9a 0       ამოუ/&x     .
  
PFX 0c Y 1
PFX 0c 0       ჩამო/&x     .

PFX 1c Y 1
PFX 1c 0       ჩამოვ/&x     .

PFX 2c Y 1
PFX 2c 0       ჩამომ/&x     .

PFX 3c Y 1
PFX 3c 0       ჩამოგ/&x     .

PFX 4c Y 3
PFX 4c 0       ჩამოს/&x        [დტთძწცჯჭჩ]
PFX 4c 0       ჩამოჰ/&x        [გკქგყ]
PFX 4c 0       ჩამო/&x [^დტთძწცჯჭჩგკქგყ]

PFX 5c Y 1
PFX 5c 0       ჩამოგვ/&x    .

PFX 6c Y 1
PFX 6c 0       ჩამომი/&x    .

PFX 7c Y 1
PFX 7c 0       ჩამოგი/&x    .

PFX 8c Y 1
PFX 8c 0       ჩამოგვი/&x   .

PFX 9c Y 1
PFX 9c 0       ჩამოუ/&x     .
  
PFX 0E Y 1
PFX 0E 0       შე/&x     .

PFX 1E Y 1
PFX 1E 0       შევ/&x     .

PFX 2E Y 1
PFX 2E 0       შემ/&x     .

PFX 3E Y 1
PFX 3E 0       შეგ/&x     .

PFX 4E Y 3
PFX 4E 0       შეს/&x        [დტთძწცჯჭჩ]
PFX 4E 0       შეჰ/&x        [გკქგყ]
PFX 4E 0       შე/&x [^დტთძწცჯჭჩგკქგყ]

PFX 5E Y 1
PFX 5E 0       შეგვ/&x    .

PFX 6E Y 1
PFX 6E 0       შემი/&x    .

PFX 7E Y 1
PFX 7E 0       შეგი/&x    .

PFX 8E Y 1
PFX 8E 0       შეგვი/&x   .

PFX 9E Y 1
PFX 9E 0       შეუ/&x     .
  
PFX 0G Y 1
PFX 0G 0       გა/&x     .

PFX 1G Y 1
PFX 1G 0       გავ/&x     .

PFX 2G Y 1
PFX 2G 0       გამ/&x     .

PFX 3G Y 1
PFX 3G 0       გაგ/&x     .

PFX 4G Y 3
PFX 4G 0       გას/&x        [დტთძწცჯჭჩ]
PFX 4G 0       გაჰ/&x        [გკქგყ]
PFX 4G 0       გა/&x [^დტთძწცჯჭჩგკქგყ]

PFX 5G Y 1
PFX 5G 0       გაგვ/&x    .

PFX 6G Y 1
PFX 6G 0       გამი/&x    .

PFX 7G Y 1
PFX 7G 0       გაგი/&x    .

PFX 8G Y 1
PFX 8G 0       გაგვი/&x   .

PFX 9G Y 1
PFX 9G 0       გაუ/&x     .
  
PFX 0e Y 1
PFX 0e 0       შემო/&x     .

PFX 1e Y 1
PFX 1e 0       შემოვ/&x     .

PFX 2e Y 1
PFX 2e 0       შემომ/&x     .

PFX 3e Y 1
PFX 3e 0       შემოგ/&x     .

PFX 4e Y 3
PFX 4e 0       შემოს/&x        [დტთძწცჯჭჩ]
PFX 4e 0       შემოჰ/&x        [გკქგყ]
PFX 4e 0       შემო/&x [^დტთძწცჯჭჩგკქგყ]

PFX 5e Y 1
PFX 5e 0       შემოგვ/&x    .

PFX 6e Y 1
PFX 6e 0       შემომი/&x    .

PFX 7e Y 1
PFX 7e 0       შემოგი/&x    .

PFX 8e Y 1
PFX 8e 0       შემოგვი/&x   .

PFX 9e Y 1
PFX 9e 0       შემოუ/&x     .
  
PFX 0g Y 1
PFX 0g 0       გამო/&x     .

PFX 1g Y 1
PFX 1g 0       გამოვ/&x     .

PFX 2g Y 1
PFX 2g 0       გამომ/&x     .

PFX 3g Y 1
PFX 3g 0       გამოგ/&x     .

PFX 4g Y 3
PFX 4g 0       გამოს/&x        [დტთძწცჯჭჩ]
PFX 4g 0       გამოჰ/&x        [გკქგყ]
PFX 4g 0       გამო/&x [^დტთძწცჯჭჩგკქგყ]

PFX 5g Y 1
PFX 5g 0       გამოგვ/&x    .

PFX 6g Y 1
PFX 6g 0       გამომი/&x    .

PFX 7g Y 1
PFX 7g 0       გამოგი/&x    .

PFX 8g Y 1
PFX 8g 0       გამოგვი/&x   .

PFX 9g Y 1
PFX 9g 0       გამოუ/&x     .
  
PFX 0X Y 1
PFX 0X 0       გადა/&x     .

PFX 1X Y 1
PFX 1X 0       გადავ/&x     .

PFX 2X Y 1
PFX 2X 0       გადამ/&x     .

PFX 3X Y 1
PFX 3X 0       გადაგ/&x     .

PFX 4X Y 3
PFX 4X 0       გადას/&x        [დტთძწცჯჭჩ]
PFX 4X 0       გადაჰ/&x        [გკქგყ]
PFX 4X 0       გადა/&x [^დტთძწცჯჭჩგკქგყ]

PFX 5X Y 1
PFX 5X 0       გადაგვ/&x    .

PFX 6X Y 1
PFX 6X 0       გადამი/&x    .

PFX 7X Y 1
PFX 7X 0       გადაგი/&x    .

PFX 8X Y 1
PFX 8X 0       გადაგვი/&x   .

PFX 9X Y 1
PFX 9X 0       გადაუ/&x     .
  
PFX 0x Y 1
PFX 0x 0       გადმო/&x     .

PFX 1x Y 1
PFX 1x 0       გადმოვ/&x     .

PFX 2x Y 1
PFX 2x 0       გადმომ/&x     .

PFX 3x Y 1
PFX 3x 0       გადმოგ/&x     .

PFX 4x Y 3
PFX 4x 0       გადმოს/&x        [დტთძწცჯჭჩ]
PFX 4x 0       გადმოჰ/&x        [გკქგყ]
PFX 4x 0       გადმო/&x [^დტთძწცჯჭჩგკქგყ]

PFX 5x Y 1
PFX 5x 0       გადმოგვ/&x    .

PFX 6x Y 1
PFX 6x 0       გადმომი/&x    .

PFX 7x Y 1
PFX 7x 0       გადმოგი/&x    .

PFX 8x Y 1
PFX 8x 0       გადმოგვი/&x   .

PFX 9x Y 1
PFX 9x 0       გადმოუ/&x     .
  
PFX 0W Y 1
PFX 0W 0       წა/&x     .

PFX 1W Y 1
PFX 1W 0       წავ/&x     .

PFX 2W Y 1
PFX 2W 0       წამ/&x     .

PFX 3W Y 1
PFX 3W 0       წაგ/&x     .

PFX 4W Y 3
PFX 4W 0       წას/&x        [დტთძწცჯჭჩ]
PFX 4W 0       წაჰ/&x        [გკქგყ]
PFX 4W 0       წა/&x [^დტთძწცჯჭჩგკქგყ]

PFX 5W Y 1
PFX 5W 0       წაგვ/&x    .

PFX 6W Y 1
PFX 6W 0       წამი/&x    .

PFX 7W Y 1
PFX 7W 0       წაგი/&x    .
