dictionaries/ka_GE.dic
ადამიანი/NPNSNN
ავაზაკი/NPNSNN
ავტორობა/NSNN
აინშტაინი/NSNN
ალბომი/NSNN
ალტრუიზმი/NSNN
ამიაკი/NSNN
ამპლიტუდა/NSNN
ანგარიში/NPNSNN
ანძა/NPNSNN
არაცნობიერი/NSNN
არომატი/NSNN
არქიფო/NSNN
ასლი/NSNN
ატრიბუტი/NSNN
აქა/NSNN
აღზრდა/NSNN
აღსასრული/NSNN
აჭარე/NSNN
ბაგე/NPNSNN
ბალეტი/NSNN
ბარათი/NPNSNN
ბაღი/NPNSNN
ბეთლემი/NSNN
ბეტანკური/NSNN
ბილიარდი/NSNN
ბიჯი/NSNN
ბომბო/NSNN
ბრალი/NSNN
ბუ/NSNN
ბუჩქი/NPNSNN
გადაკეთება/NSNN
გადაცემა/NPNSNN
გაზვიადება/NSNN
გამარჯვებული/NSNN
გამონათქვამი/NPNSNN
გამოჩენა/NSNN
გამყოლი/NPNSNN
განდეგილობა/NSNN
განსხვავებულობა/NSNN
გაორება/NSNN
გარსი/NPNSNN
გაუგებრობა/NPNSNN
გაყოლება/NSNN
გახდა/NSNN
გენეტიკა/NSNN
გველი/NPNSNN
გიტარა/NSNN
გოლი/NSNN
გრაფიკა/NPNSNN
გულგრილობა/NSNN
გურია/NSNN
დაგეგმვა/NSNN
დავლათი/NSNN
დაკარგვა/NSNN
დამოუკიდებლობა/NSNN
დანგლარი/NPNSNN
დარგი/NPNSNN
დასი/NSNN
დაფარვა/NSNN
დაღწევა/NSNN
დაწვა/NSNN
დედა/NPNSNN
დეკორაცია/NSNN
დეპეშა/NSNN
დიაგონალი/NSNN
დიელექტრიკი/NSNN
დისკი/NPNSNN
დოგმატიკა/NSNN
დრეიკურსი/NSNN
დღე/NPNSNN
ეგრისი/NSNN
ეკოლოგია/NSNN
ელისო/NSNN
ეპიგრაფი/NSNN
ერთგვაროვნება/NSNN
ესოდენი/NSNN
ექსა/NSNN
ეჭვიანობა/NSNN
ვაჟები/NSNN
ვე/NSNN
ვერსი/NSNN
ვიკონტი/NSNN
ზარები/NSNN
ზელანდია/NSNN
ზნე/NSNN
ზღვარი/NSNN
თავდაჯერებულობა/NSNN
თათბირი/NPNSNN
თანამედროვეობა/NSNN
თარეში/NSNN
თეზა/NSNN
თერთმეტი/NSNN
თვითეული/NSNN
თინათინი/NSNN
თქვენგანი/NSNN
იაკობინელი/NSNN
იგივეობა/NSNN
ივლისი/NSNN
იმიტაცია/NSNN
ინდიკატორები/NSNN
ინსტიტუცია/NPNSNN
ინფექცია/NSNN
ისაკი/NSNN
იქა/NSNN
კავკასია/NSNN
კალათები/NSNN
კანონი/NPNSNN
კარადა/NPNSNN
კარნახი/NSNN
კბილი/NPNSNN
კერძი/NSNN
კვირა/NSNN
კიკინი/NSNN
კლასიფიკაცია/NSNN
კოლეგა/NPNSNN
კომისია/NPNSNN
კონდორი/NSNN
კონსული/NSNN
კოოპერაცია/NSNN
კოტორი/NSNN
კრიზისი/NPNSNN
კულტურა/NPNSNN
ლაზი/NPNSNN
ლაპერუზი/NSNN
ლეგიონი/NSNN
ლილვი/NSNN
ლოგინი/NPNSNN
ლუთერელობა/NSNN
მაგიდა/NPNSNN
მაზრა/NSNN
მამა/NPNSNN
მანეთი/NSNN
მარაქა/NSNN
მარმარილო/NSNN
მარჯვენე/NSNN
მაუდი/NSNN
მგზავრი/NPNSNN
მეგზური/NSNN
მეზღვაური/NPNSNN
მემკვიდრე/NPNSNN
მერხი/NPNSNN
მეტრი/NSNN
მეშვიდე/NSNN
მზერა/NSNN
მი/NPNSNN
მიკროკოსმოსი/NSNN
მიმოქცევა/NSNN
მისამართი/NPNSNN
მიქცევა/NSNN
მიჯნურობა/NSNN
მნათე/NSNN
მოგზაურობა/NSNN
მოკვლა/NSNN
მონა/NPNSNN
მორა/NPNSNN
მოსაწევარი/NSNN
მოურავები/NSNN
მოყმე/NSNN
მოწვევა/NSNN
მოხევე/NPNSNN
მსაჯული/NPNSNN
მტვერი/NSNN
მური/NSNN
მუხლი/NPNSNN
მშვიდი/NSNN
მძევლები/NSNN
მწუხრი/NSNN
მხსნელი/NSNN
ნავიგაცია/NSNN
ნაკვთი/NPNSNN
ნაპირი/NPNSNN
ნაღვერდალი/NSNN
ნაწყვეტი/NSNN
ნდომა/NSNN
ნესტი/NSNN
ნინი/NSNN
ნიჭი/NPNSNN
ნულა/NPNSNN
ოთხასი/NSNN
ოპტიკა/NSNN
ორი/NSNN
ოტეილი/NSNN
ოჯახი/NPNSNN
პანტა/NSNN
პარიზი/NSNN
პატაკი/NSNN
პედაგოგი/NPNSNN
პიესა/NPNSNN
პისტოლეტი/NPNSNN
პოზა/NSNN
პორტუგალია/NSNN
პრიმატი/NPNSNN
პროკურორი/NSNN
პროცენტი/NSNN
ჟამი/NSNN
რა/NPNSNN
რაობა/NSNN
რეალიზმი/NSNN
რეზიდენცია/NSNN
რეპერტუარი/NSNN
რთული/NSNN
რკინა/NSNN
რომი/NSNN
რღვევა/NSNN
საბანაო/NSNN
სადგამი/NSNN
საზი/NSNN
საიმედოობა/NSNN
სალამი/NSNN
სამეუფო/NSNN
სამოსი/NSNN
სამწუხარო/NSNN
სანოვაგე/NSNN
სარჩო/NSNN
სასწაული/NPNSNN
საფარველი/NSNN
საღმრთო/NSNN
საძირე/NSNN
სახა/NSNN
სახლი/NPNSNN
სელი/NSNN
სექტა/NPNSNN
სიახლოვე/NSNN
სიზუსტე/NSNN
სიმარტივე/NSNN
სიმრავლე/NPNSNN
სინა/NSNN
სიორიძე/NSNN
სისწრაფე/NSNN
სიყვითლე/NSNN
სიძლიერე/NSNN
სკულპტურა/NSNN
სპარსეთი/NSNN
სპორტი/NSNN
სტატისტიკა/NSNN
სუ/NSNNTN
სუნი/NSNN
სქესი/NSNN
სხივი/NPNSNN
ტანისამოსი/NSNN
ტბე/NSNN
ტერმინი/NPNSNN
ტიპი/NPNSNN
ტომი/NPNSNN
ტრანსფერი/NPNSNN
ტულიო/NSNN
ტყვეობა/NSNN
უზენაესობა/NSNN
უკუკავშირი/NSNN
უმიკაშვილი/NSNN
უპირატესობა/NPNSNN
ურჩხული/NSNN
უყურადღებობა/NSNN
უხვი/NSNNOXAGaGkGAXaXkX
ფანტასტიკური/NSNN
ფასეულობა/NPNSNN
ფერისცვალება/NSNN
ფი/NSNN
ფიქსატორი/NPNSNN
ფორანი/NSNN
ფრანკი/NSNN
ფული/NPNSNN
ქალბატონი/NSNN
ქაჯეთი/NSNN
ქვევე/NSNN
ქვრივი/NSNN
ქმნადობა/NSNN
ქრომოსომა/NPNSNN
ღამე/NSNN
ღვთაებრივი/NSNN
ღმრთაებრიობა/NSNN
ღუმელი/NPNSNN
ყელი/NPNSNN
ყრილი/NSNN
შეზღუდვა/NPNSNN
შემცველობა/NSNN
შესვლა/NSNN
შეცნობა/NSNN
შინაგანი/NSNN
შუალედები/NSNN
ჩანგი/NSNN
ჩიტა/NPNSNN
ცენტრე/NSNN
ცნობა/NPNSNN
ძალადობა/NSNN
ძმობილი/NSNN
წარმოშობა/NSNN
წვერა/NPNSNN
წინსვლა/NSNN
წყევლა/NSNN
ჭიხვინი/NSNN
ხარი/NPNSNN
ხელმწიფე/NPNSNN
ხიდა/NPNSNN
ხროვა/NSNN
ჯარისკაცი/NPNSNN
ჯოჯოხეთი/NSNN
